Arkansas, session 2025, SB88.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - GENERAL OPERATIONS. There is hereby
established for the Department of Education - Division of Higher Education
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular
employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U024U DHE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE05
(2) D022N IT SENIOR PROJECT MANAGER 1 GRADE IT09
(3) D012C DATABASE SPECIALIST 2 GRADE IT08
*KMW014*
04-03-2025 14:49:24 KMW014

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB88
(4) D007C INFORMATION SYSTEMS MANAGER 2 GRADE IT08
(5) D028C SENIOR SOFTWARE SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT07
(6) D016C SENIOR TECHNOLOGY ANALYST 1 GRADE IT06
(7) G281C ADE POLICY & SPECIAL PROJECTS DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS15
(8) N002N DHE SENIOR ASSOC DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS15
(9) N069N ADE SPECIAL ADVISOR 1 GRADE GS14
(10) N055N DHE ASSOCIATE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS14
(11) A010C AGENCY CONTROLLER II 1 GRADE GS13
(12) N054N DHE CAREER PATHWAYS DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS13
(13) N167N DHS POLICY & RESEARCH DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS12
(14) A027C ACCOUNTING OPERATIONS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS11
(15) G058C DHE FEDERAL PROGRAM MANAGER 2 GRADE GS11
(16) E061C ACE PROGRAM COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS10
(17) G071C DHE PROGRAM COORDINATOR 6 GRADE GS10
(18) E062C ACE PROGRAM ADVISOR 2 GRADE GS09
(19) G102C DHE PROGRAM SPECIALIST 18 GRADE GS09
(20) G080C NATIONAL & COMMUNITY SVCS EXEC. DIR. 1 GRADE GS09
(21) G295C OSTEOPATHIC RURAL MED PROG ADMIN 1 GRADE GS09
(22) G147C GRANTS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(23) G180C GRANTS ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(24) A084C PROGRAM/FIELD AUDIT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(25) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
(26) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 1 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 52

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - GENERAL OPERATIONS. There is hereby
authorized, for the Department of Education - Division of Higher Education
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or
temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds
appropriated herein for such purposes: fifteen (15) temporary or part-time
employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act
for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - GENERAL OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the Division
04-03-2025 14:49:24 KMW014

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB88
of Higher Education Fund Account, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Education - Division of Higher Education -
General Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $2,367,990
(02) EXTRA HELP 75,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 777,058
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 909,346
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 49,659
(C) PROF. FEES 25,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 50,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) STATEWIDE PROMOTION 295,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $4,549,053

SECTION 4. EXTRA HELP - STATE BOARD OF PRIVATE CAREER EDUCATION. There
is hereby authorized, for the Department of Education - Division of Higher
Education - State Board of Private Career Education for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be
known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such
purposes: two (2) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of
pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and
Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate
classification.

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - STATE BOARD OF PRIVATE CAREER EDUCATION -
OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to
be payable from the Private Career Education Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Education - Division of Higher
Education - State Board of Private Career Education - Operations for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
04-03-2025 14:49:24 KMW014

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB88
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $163,983
(02) EXTRA HELP 20,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 55,427
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 63,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 4,000
(C) PROF. FEES 6,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $312,410

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - STUDENT ASSISTANCE GRANTS AND VARIOUS
SCHOLARSHIPS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education,
to be payable from the Higher Education Grants Fund Account, for providing
student assistance grants and various scholarships as provided by law of the
Department of Education - Division of Higher Education - Student Assistance
Grants and Various Scholarships for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ARKANSAS FUTURE GRANTS $5,000,000
(02) NATIONAL GUARD TUITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM 4,400,000
(03) SINGLE PARENT SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM 175,000
(04) STATE TEACHER EDUCATION PROGRAM 4,000,000
(05) TEACHER OPPORTUNITY PROGRAM 2,500,000
(06) AR GEOGRAPHICAL CRITICAL NEEDS
MINORITY TEACHER SCHOLARSHIPS 150,000
(07) ARKANSAS HEROES SCHOLARSHIP 5,500,000
(08) GOVERNOR'S HIGHER EDUCATION
TRANSITION SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM 2,000,000
(09) SREB MINORITY DOCTORAL SCHOLARS 175,000
(10) WASHINGTON CENTER SCHOLARSHIPS 150,000
(11) TUITION ADJUSTMENT 350,000
(12) AR ACADEMIC CHALLENGE SCHOLARSHIPS 25,000,000
04-03-2025 14:49:24 KMW014

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB88
(13) AR GOVERNOR'S SCHOLAR 22,000,000
(14) STUDENT UNDERGRADUATE RESEARCH FELLOWSHIP PROGRAM (SURF) 150,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $71,550,000

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - TECHNICAL EDUCATION - FEDERAL PROGRAMS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable
from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of
Education - Division of Higher Education - Technical Education - Federal
Programs for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $139,791
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 49,594
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 108,271
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 80,000
(C) PROF. FEES 157,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $534,656

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - RESEARCH DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the
Research Development Fund, for providing Arkansas Research Development
Program Grants to Institutions of Higher Education by the Department of
Education - Division of Higher Education - Research Development Program for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM GRANTS $750,000

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - HEALTH EDUCATION GRANTS AND LOANS. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the
04-03-2025 14:49:24 KMW014

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB88
Higher Education Grants Fund Account, for payments of contracts and loans
with participating out-of-state institutions of higher learning in the fields
of dentistry, optometry, veterinary medicine, chiropractic, and podiatry for
the education of Arkansas citizens by the Department of Education - Division
of Higher Education - Health Education Grants and Loans for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) CHIROPRACTIC AID $260,000
(02) DENTAL AID - GRANTS 2,950,000
(03) OPTOMETRY AID - GRANTS 650,000
(04) PODIATRY AID 130,400
(05) VETERINARY AID FORGIVENESS PROGRAM 1,750,000
(06) DENTAL AID - LOANS 987,370
(07) OPTOMETRY AID - LOANS 140,000
(08) VETERINARY MED. LOAN FORGIVENESS PROGRAM 250,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $7,117,770

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - CASH. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Education, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the
State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
operating expenses of the Department of Education - Division of Higher
Education - Cash for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $269,233
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 32,865
(C) PROF. FEES 63,932
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) SCHOLARSHIPS 50,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $416,030

04-03-2025 14:49:24 KMW014

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB88
SECTION 11. APPROPRIATION - PRIVATE CAREER EDUCATION BOARD - CASH.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable
from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for operating expenses of the Department of
Education - Division of Higher Education - Private Career Education Board -
Cash for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $9,500
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 6,000
(C) PROF. FEES 5,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $20,500

SECTION 12. APPROPRIATION - STUDENT PROTECTION TRUST. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the Private
Career School Student Protection Trust Fund, for expenses, claims and fees of
the Department of Education - Division of Higher Education - State Board of
Private Career Education - Student Protection Trust for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) EXPENSES/CLAIMS/FEES $300,000

SECTION 13. APPROPRIATION - TANF PROGRAM - FEDERAL. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the federal
funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal
services, operating expenses, grants and aid by the Department of Education -
Division of Higher Education - TANF Program - Federal for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
04-03-2025 14:49:24 KMW014

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB88
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $292,016
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 100,134
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 80,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 60,000
(C) PROF. FEES 70,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) SELF SUFFICIENCY/JOB TRAINING GRANTS 6,547,850
(05) ENROLLMENT AND EDUCATION 3,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $10,150,000

SECTION 14. APPROPRIATION - WEB BASED APPLICATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the Higher
Education Grants Fund Account, for personal services and operating expenses
associated with web based applications of the Department of Education -
Division of Higher Education - Web Based Applications for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) WEB BASED APPLICATIONS PERSONAL
SERVICES AND OPERATING EXPENSES $500,000

SECTION 15. APPROPRIATION - SCHOLARSHIP ADMINISTRATION. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the
Higher Education Grants Fund Account, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Education - Division of Higher Education -
Scholarship Administration for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $282,079
(02) EXTRA HELP 10,000
04-03-2025 14:49:24 KMW014

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB88
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 107,174
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 285,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 30,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $714,253

SECTION 16. APPROPRIATION - WORKFORCE INITIATIVE ACT OF 2015. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the
Workforce Initiative Act of 2015 Fund, for workforce education grants,
administrative and operating expenses of the Department of Education -
Division of Higher Education - Workforce Initiative Act of 2015 for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) WORKFORCE INITIATIVE ACT OF 2015 EXPENSES $8,000,000

SECTION 17. APPROPRIATION - VETERAN'S APPROVING AGENCY - FEDERAL.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable
from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of
Education - Division of Higher Education - Veteran's Approving Agency -
Federal for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $239,841
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 88,427
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 53,546
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 9,623
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
04-03-2025 14:49:24 KMW014

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB88
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $391,437

SECTION 18. APPROPRIATION - AMERICORPS - OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the Division
of Higher Education Fund Account, for personal services, operating expenses,
and grants and aid by the Department of Education - Division of Higher
Education - AmeriCorps - Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $324,617
(02) EXTRA HELP 30,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 126,827
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 363,650
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 85,650
(C) PROF. FEES 2,500
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) GRANTS AND AID 50,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $983,244

SECTION 19. APPROPRIATION - AMERICORPS - GRANTS AND AID. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the
Division of Higher Education Fund Account, for grants and aid by the
Department of Education - Division of Higher Education - AmeriCorps - Grants
and Aid for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) GRANTS AND AID $2,010,704

SECTION 20. APPROPRIATION - OSTEOPATHIC RURAL MEDICAL PRACTICE STUDENT
LOAN AND SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the
04-03-2025 14:49:24 KMW014

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB88
Department of Education, to be payable from the Higher Education Grants Fund
Account, for Osteopathic Rural Medical Practice Student Loan & Scholarship
Program loans and/or scholarships by the Department of Education - Division
of Higher Education - Osteopathic Rural Medical Practice Student Loan &
Scholarship Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) OSTEOPATHIC RURAL MEDICAL PRACTICE
STUDENT LOANS/SCHOLARSHIP $400,000

SECTION 21. APPROPRIATION - GRADUATE MEDICAL EDUCATION RESIDENCY
EXPANSION BOARD. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Education, to be payable from the Graduate Medical Education Fund, for
planning grants to eligible entities for graduate medical education residency
program expansion or new programs, and for board expenses and reimbursements
of the Department of Education - Division of Higher Education - Graduate
Medical Education Residency Expansion Board for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) GRADUATE MEDICAL EDUCATION RESIDENCY EXPANSION BOARD $10,000,000

SECTION 22. APPROPRIATION - HISTORICALLY BLACK COLLEGES AND
UNIVERSITIES GRANTS AND EXPENSES. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Education, to be payable from the Higher Education Grants Fund
Account, for grants for scholarships to Historically Black Colleges and
Universities and for personal services and operating expenses as determined
by the Division of Higher Education for outreach programs to promote
awareness of those scholarships of the Department of Education - Division of
Higher Education - HBCU Grants and Expenses for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
04-03-2025 14:49:24 KMW014

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB88
(01) HBCU GRANTS AND EXPENSES $4,000,000

SECTION 23. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS TEACHER ACADEMY SCHOLARSHIP
PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be
payable from the Arkansas Teacher Academy Scholarship Program Fund, for
scholarships, personal services, and operating expenses necessary to create
and maintain the Arkansas Teacher Academy Scholarship Program by the
Department of Education - Division of Higher Education - Arkansas Teacher
Academy Scholarship Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) AR TEACHER ACADEMY SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM $12,000,000

SECTION 24. APPROPRIATION - SUSTAINABLE BUILDING MAINTENANCE PROGRAM
FOR STATE-SUPPORTED INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the
Sustainable Building Maintenance Program for State-Supported Institutions of
Higher Education Revolving Loan Fund, for transfers or loans to a state-
supported institution of higher education for deferred maintenance, critical
maintenance, or renovation of state-owned property of the Department of
Education - Division of Higher Education - Sustainable Building Maintenance
Program for State-Supported Institutions of Higher Education for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) LOANS $7,437,405

SECTION 25. REGULAR SALARIES - NORTHWEST TECHNICAL INSTITUTE.
There is hereby established for the Department of Education - Division of
Higher Education - Northwest Technical Institute for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
04-03-2025 14:49:24 KMW014

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB88
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) NWT10C NWTI DIRECTOR 1 $169,298
(2) NWT07C NWTI ASSISTANT DIRECTOR 2 $127,195
(3) NWT19P NWTI NURSE INSTRUCTOR 6 $124,726
(4) NWT06P NWTI AMMONIA & INDUST TRAIN SUPV/EXPERT 1 $112,976
(5) NWT12P NWTI EDUC PROG SUPV/EXPERT 3 $112,976
(6) NWT01P NWTI ACCOUNTANT II 1 $95,564
(7) NWT09P NWTI CAREER & TECH FACULTY II 7 $95,564
(8) NWT05P NWTI AMMONIA & INDUST TRAINER 2 $93,367
(9) NWT21P NWTI USER SUPPORT ANALYST 2 $89,613
(10) NWT08P NWTI CAREER & TECH FACULTY I 28 $86,876
(11) NWT11P NWTI EDUCATION PROGRAM COORDINATOR 3 $84,879
(12) NWT13P NWTI EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT 1 $84,879
(13) NWT15P NWTI HR COORDINATOR 1 $84,879
(14) NWT20P NWTI TRAINER 3 $84,879
(15) NWT17P NWTI MAINT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT 2 $77,163
(16) NWT02P NWTI ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 2 $70,148
(17) NWT03P NWTI ADMINISTRATIVE COORDINATOR 5 $63,770
(18) NWT14P NWTI FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 $63,770
(19) NWT16P NWTI HR SPECIALIST 1 $63,770
(20) NWT18P NWTI MAINTENANCE TECHNICIAN 3 $57,973
(21) NWT04P NWTI ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST 4 $52,703
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 79

SECTION 26. EXTRA HELP - NORTHWEST TECHNICAL INSTITUTE. There is
hereby authorized, for the Department of Education - Division of Higher
Education - Northwest Technical Institute for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as
"Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: one
hundred thirty-five (135) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at
rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and
Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate
classification.

04-03-2025 14:49:24 KMW014

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB88
SECTION 27. APPROPRIATION - NORTHWEST TECHNICAL INSTITUTE - STATE.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable
from the Northwest Technical Institute Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Education - Division of Higher
Education - Northwest Technical Institute - State for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $3,199,793
(02) EXTRA HELP 453,411
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,199,110
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 668,564
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 44,866
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $5,565,744

SECTION 28. APPROPRIATION - NORTHWEST TECHNICAL INSTITUTE - FEDERAL.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable
from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of
Education - Division of Higher Education - Northwest Technical Institute -
Federal for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $82,696
(02) EXTRA HELP 171,492
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 47,690
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 14,278
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
04-03-2025 14:49:24 KMW014

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB88
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $316,156

SECTION 29. APPROPRIATION - NORTHWEST TECHNICAL INSTITUTE - CASH.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable
from cash funds as defined by Arkansas Code §19-4-801, for personal services
and operating expenses of the Department of Education - Division of Higher
Education - Northwest Technical Institute - Cash for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,005,551
(02) EXTRA HELP 556,450
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 440,606
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,894,530
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 15,000
(C) PROF. FEES 275,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 200,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) RESALE 325,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $4,712,137

SECTION 30. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
DHE - REALLOCATION OF RESOURCES FOR INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION. Upon
determination by the president or chancellor of an institution of higher
education that a reallocation of resources for purposes of reorganization or
consolidation of administrative functions within the institution is necessary
for efficient and effective operations of the institution, the president or
chancellor, with approval of the institution's board of trustees, may have
the authority to transfer positions, appropriations and related funds between
campuses, divisions, branches, and other budgetary units of the institution,
after receiving prior approval of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget
04-03-2025 14:49:24 KMW014

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB88
Committee. The transfers of positions, programs, or activities shall be used
for those purposes for which the appropriations were approved by the General
Assembly. The transfers, consolidations, or reorganizations which involve
academic programs shall be reviewed by the Division of Higher Education prior
to submission to the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee. Provided,
however, that the institution shall be limited to submitting no more than two
(2) individual transaction transfer requests during any fiscal year and shall
be further limited to no more than five percent (5%) of the total General
Revenue and Special Revenue appropriation, funding, positions specific to
each institution, and no Tobacco Settlement funds or appropriations may be
reallocated pursuant to this section.
Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of
appropriation and general revenue funding for institutions of higher
education each fiscal year is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This
is usually accomplished by delineating such maximums in the appropriation
act(s) for institutions of higher education and the general revenue
allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by amendment to the
Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly has determined that
institutions of higher education may operate more efficiently if some
flexibility is provided to institutions of higher education authorizing broad
powers under this section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate
that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of
the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee as provided by this
section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint
Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement
of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled
unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is
void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 31. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
DHE - BUILDING MAINTENANCE FUND. After the sum of $13,200,000 has been
deposited into the Higher Education Building Maintenance Fund, any additional
deposits are to be transferred to the Research Development Fund there to be
04-03-2025 14:49:24 KMW014

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB88
used as provided by law.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 32. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
DHE - TRANSFER PROVISION. Upon certification by the Director of the Division
of Higher Education that transfers are needed to make maximum utilization of
funds and appropriations provided for financial aid programs, and with the
approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and a review by the
Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee, funds and
appropriations may be transferred between financial aid programs to more
adequately align the appropriation with the number of eligible students.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 33. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
DHE - TRANSFER OF HIGHER EDUCATION GRANTS FUND APPROPRIATIONS - HEALTH
EDUCATION GRANTS AND LOANS. Upon certification to and with the approval of
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, surplus funds and appropriations may
be transferred between the appropriations provided for "Health Education
Grants and Loans" by this Act by the General Assembly for Dental Aid Grants
and Loans, Optometry Aid Grants and Loans, Veterinary Aid, Veterinary Med.
Loan Forgiveness Program, Podiatry Aid, and Chiropractic Aid.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 34. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
DHE - CONTINGENCY APPROPRIATIONS - TRANSFERS AND REPORTS. (a) Upon approval
by the Department of Education - Division of Higher Education and the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, institutions of higher education may transfer
appropriation from the cash contingency appropriation to any other
appropriation made to the institution from cash funds including the
establishment of commitment items, and may transfer appropriation from the
04-03-2025 14:49:24 KMW014

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB88
contingency appropriation made payable from each institution’s State Treasury
Fund to the state operations appropriation made payable from each
institution’s State Treasury Fund including the establishment of commitment
items, and may transfer appropriation from the contingency appropriation made
payable from the Tobacco Settlement Program Fund Accounts to any other
appropriation made to the institution from Tobacco Settlement Program Fund
Accounts including the establishment of commitment items.
(b) Contingency appropriation transfers shall only establish and
supplement commitment items that were recommended by the Higher Education
Coordinating Board in the budget manuals presented to the Legislative Council
and Joint Budget Committee.
(c) The Department of Education - Division of Higher Education shall
report contingency appropriation transfers and the establishment of any
commitment items authorized by this Section to the Legislative Council or
Joint Budget Committee for review during its July meeting. The report shall
include, by institution, the establishment of, and the amounts transferred
to, each commitment item, the reasons therefor and the source of funds.
Institutions shall submit contingency appropriation transfer and commitment
item establishment requests authorized by this Section to the Division of
Higher Education no later than July 1. Upon the failure of an institution to
submit the required information by the July 1 deadline, the Department of
Education - Division of Higher Education shall immediately notify by written
notification the chairpersons of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 35. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
DHE WORKFORCE INITIATIVE ACT FUNDING. The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
may transfer, on his or her books and those of the State Treasurer and the
Auditor of the State, funding up to the amount authorized in the Workforce
Initiative Act of 2015 appropriation section in this Act, from the Division
of Higher Education Fund Account to the Workforce Initiative Act of 2015 Fund
in order to finance the distribution of grants identified under §6-60-107.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
04-03-2025 14:49:24 KMW014

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB88
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 36. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
DHE - STATEWIDE SCHOLARSHIP AND GRANT PROMOTION. Of the general revenue that
is received by and distributed from the Higher Education Grants Fund Account,
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall transfer two hundred ninety-five
thousand dollars ($295,000) to the Division of Higher Education Fund Account
to be allocated, budgeted, committed and distributed to the Statewide
Scholarship and Grant Promotion line item in the General Operations section
of this Act for the purpose of increasing public awareness of the
scholarships and grants programs and initiatives offered by the State through
the Arkansas Department of Education - Division of Higher Education. The
Department shall utilize a minimum of one hundred forty-seven thousand five
hundred dollars ($147,500) of the aforementioned total specifically for the
promotion of the Arkansas Future Grant Program.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 37. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
GOVERNOR'S HIGHER EDUCATION TRANSITION SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM. The Department
of Education - Division of Higher Education shall provide for the
administration of the "Governor's Higher Education Transition Scholarship
Program" as appropriated in the Student Assistance Grants and Various
Scholarships Appropriation section of this Act to assist students accepted
into transitional programs for students with intellectual and/or
developmental disabilities at state institutions of higher education and
shall promulgate rules for the implementation of the program and for the
disbursement of scholarships to eligible students.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 38. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
04-03-2025 14:49:24 KMW014

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB88
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 39. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 40. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee







04-03-2025 14:49:24 KMW014